Illinois, session 104th, HB613.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Community Support Systems Act is amended by 5changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (405 ILCS 35/5)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 1105)7    Sec. 5. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8Community Support Systems Act.9(Source: P.A. 83-698.)